Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-1511
Stay of execution; recall of writ; duties of clerk and sheriff.

When the surety is entered after execution issued, the clerk shall immediately notify the sheriff of the stay, and he shall forthwith return the execution, with his doings thereon.

Laws 1875, § 7, p. 50;

R.S.1913, § 8052;

C.S.1922, § 8993;

C.S.1929, § 20-1511;

R.S.1943, § 25-1511.